Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Independent School District No. 704, Proctor, for building a regional center of excellence for career technical education in Northeastern Minnesota. The center must be overseen by a partnership between the Proctor, Hermantown, and Esko school districts and must facilitate cost-effective workforce training to meet regional industry needs. Grant money may be used for purchasing real property, building and remodeling costs, and equipment needed for career and technical education. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end